Utah statutes.
72-9-602.   Towing inspections, investigations, and certification --
Equipment requirements -- Consumer information.
(1) (a)  The department shall inspect, investigate, and certify tow truck
motor carriers, tow trucks, and tow truck drivers to ensure compliance with
this chapter and compliance with Sections 41-6a-1406 and 41-6a-1407.
(b)  The inspection, investigation, and certification shall be conducted prior
to any tow truck operation and at least every two years thereafter.
(c) (i)  The department shall issue an authorized towing certificate for each
tow truck motor carrier, tow truck, and driver that complies with this part.
(ii)  The certificate shall expire two years from the month of issuance.
(d)  The department may charge a biennial fee established under Section
63J-1-504 to cover the cost of the inspection, investigation, and
certification required under this part.
(2)  The department shall make consumer protection information available to
the public that may use a tow truck motor carrier.
